Alaska statutes. Title 43. Revenue and Taxation.
Article 2. Fiscal Responsibilities.

Sec. 43.05.140.
Bond of commissioner.

Before taking office, the commissioner shall furnish a bond to the state.
The bond shall be approved by the attorney general and filed with the Department of Administration, and a copy of it shall be filed in the attorney general’s office.
The bond shall be conditioned that the principal will faithfully discharge the duties of the office, keep a strict, true and correct account of all money disbursed, and that the principal will properly account for it and will pay over to a successor or other person entitled by law to receive it all money or property in the hands or possession of the principal, in accordance with law; or, in default, that the parties executing the bond will pay to the state and others injured all damages, costs, and expenses resulting from the default. The surety on the bond shall be a surety company authorized to transact business in the state.
All premiums for the commissioner’s bond shall be paid by the state. The amount of the bond shall be $200,000, but if the funds in the treasury of the state exceed the amount of the bond given by the commissioner, or if for any reason the governor and the Department of Administration consider the bond insufficient they shall notify the commissioner of that fact, and the commissioner shall give the additional bond with sufficient sureties, within the time and in the amount that the governor and the Department of Administration consider necessary for the safety of the state.

History.

(§ 7-1-4 ACLA 1949)

Sec. 43.05.150.
Collection of state money.

The department shall demand, sue for, collect, receive, and safely keep all money of the state that is not by law entrusted to the care and custody of some other office.

[Repealed, § 53 ch 32 SLA 1971.]

[Repealed, § 53 ch 32 SLA 1971.]

[Repealed, § 53 ch 32 SLA 1971.]

[Repealed, § 9 ch 218 SLA 1976.]

History.

(§ 7-1-6 (a) ACLA 1949; am § 1 ch 50 SLA 1949; am § 19 ch 186 SLA 1957; am § 1 ch 39 SLA 1963; am §§ 52, 53 ch 32 SLA 1971; am § 9 ch 218 SLA 1976; am § 4 ch 149 SLA 1978)

Administrative Code. —

For oil and gas exploration, production and pipeline transportation property tax, see 15 AAC 56.

Sec. 43.05.170.
Payment and negotiability of warrants.

A warrant drawn by the Department of Administration against the state treasury must be a negotiable instrument. Upon presentation for payment, the department shall pay all warrants drawn by the Department of Administration against the state treasury that have been properly endorsed and have not been cancelled by law. The commissioner may designate one or more agents for the purpose of redeeming state warrants and may require that these agents be used exclusively for the purpose of redeeming state warrants. Warrants made payable to two or more persons in an amount less than $50 may be paid if endorsed by only one of the designated payees. In this section, “negotiable instrument” has the meaning given in AS

45.03.104(a)

.

History.

(§ 7-1-6 (c) ACLA 1949; am § 20 ch 186 SLA 1957; am § 1 ch 44 SLA 1969; am § 5 ch 149 SLA 1978; am § 1 ch 37 SLA 2005)

Sec. 43.05.180.
Accounting for state funds.

The department shall keep an account of money received, money disbursed, and money and investments in its custody.

History.

(§ 7-1-6 (d), (e) ACLA 1949; am §§ 21, 22 ch 186 SLA 1957; am § 2 ch 44 SLA 1969)

Administrative Code. —

For corporate net income tax; special rules for oil and gas corporations, see 15 AAC 20, art. 4.

Sec. 43.05.190.
Embezzlement. [Repealed, § 112 ch 6 SLA 1984.
For current law see AS 11.46.210.]

Sec. 43.05.200.
Application for and receipt of funds due from United States.

The department shall apply to the federal government for money which is due to the state.
The department may receive the money and deposit it in the state treasury to be expended in accordance with the law.

History.

(§ 7-1-10 ACLA 1949)

Sec. 43.05.210.
Funds received under the Federal Mineral Leasing Act. [Repealed, § 70 ch 14 SLA 1987.]